California statutes. Labor Code
(e) (1) An artist may cancel a contract or within 10 business days from the date he or she commences utilizing the services under the contract. An artist shall notify the talent service of the cancellation for talent services within 10 business days of the date he or she executed the contract by mailing, delivering, or sending by facsimile transmission to the talent service, a signed and dated copy of the cancellation notice or any other written notice of cancellation, or by sending a notice of
 cancellation via the Internet if the contract was executed in part or in whole through the Internet. A talent service shall refund all fees paid by, or on behalf of, an artist within 10 business days after delivery of the cancellation notice.

(2) Unless a talent service conspicuously discloses in the contract that cancellation is prohibited after the 10-day cancellation period described in paragraph (1), an artist may cancel a contract for talent services at any time after the 10-day cancellation period by mailing, delivering, or sending by facsimile transmission to the talent service a signed and dated copy of the cancellation notice or any other written notice of cancellation, or by sending a notice of cancellation via the Internet if the contract was executed in part or in whole through the Internet. Within 10 business days after delivery
 of the cancellation notice, the talent service shall refund to the artist on a pro rata basis all fees paid by, or on behalf of, the artist.

(f) A contract between an artist and a talent service shall have
 a term of not more than one year and shall not be renewed automatically.

(g) The talent service shall maintain the address set forth in the contract for receipt of cancellation and for removal of an Internet Web site or other listing, unless it furnishes the artist with written notice of a change of address. Written notice of a change of address may be done by email if the artist designates an email address in the contract for purposes of receiving written notice.

(h) The talent service shall advise a person inquiring about canceling a contract to follow the written procedures for cancellation set forth in the contract.

(i) Before the artist signs a contract and before the artist or any person acting on his or her behalf becomes obligated to pay or pays any fee, the talent service shall provide a copy of the contract to the artist for the artist to keep. If the contract was executed through the Internet, the talent service may provide a copy of the contract to the artist by making it available to be downloaded and printed through the Internet.

(j) The talent service shall maintain the original executed contract on file at its place of
 business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 245, Sec. 1.   (AB 2068)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1703.1.

(a) Every person engaging in the business of a talent service shall keep and maintain records of the talent service business, including the following:

(1) The name and address of each artist contracting with the talent service.

(2) The amount of the fees paid by or for the artist during the term of the contract with the talent service.

(3) Records described in clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 1701.

(4) Records described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1703.6.

(5) Records described in subdivision (j) of Section 1703.

(6) Records described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1703.4.

(7) Records described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1703.4.

(8) Records described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 1703.4.

(9) The name, address, date of birth, social security number, federal tax identification number, and driver’s license number and state of issuance thereof, of the owner of the talent service and of the corporate officers of the talent service, if it is owned by a corporation.

(10) The legal name, principal residence address, date of birth, and
 driver’s license number and state of issuance thereof, of every talent scout and the name each talent scout uses while soliciting artists.

(11) Any other information that the Labor Commissioner requires.

(b) All books, records, and other papers kept pursuant to this chapter by a talent service shall be open for inspection during the hours between 9 a.m. and 5 p.m., inclusive, Monday to Friday, inclusive, except legal holidays, by a peace officer or a representative from the Labor Commissioner, the Attorney General, any district attorney, or any city attorney. Every talent service shall furnish to the Labor Commissioner, a law enforcement officer, the Attorney General, any district attorney, or any city attorney, upon request, a true copy of those books, records, and papers, or any portion thereof, and shall make reports as the Labor Commissioner requires. The inspecting party
 shall maintain the confidentiality of any personal identifying information contained in the records maintained pursuant to this section, and shall not share, sell, or transfer the information to any third party unless it is otherwise authorized by state or federal law.

A written or verbal solicitation or advertisement for an artist to perform or demonstrate any talent for the talent service, or to appear for an interview with the talent service, shall include the following clear and conspicuous statement: “This is not an audition for employment or for obtaining a talent agent or talent management.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1703.3.

(a) Prior to advertising or engaging in business, a talent service shall file with the Labor Commissioner a bond in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or a deposit in lieu of the bond pursuant to Section 995.710 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The bond shall be executed by a corporate surety qualified to do business in this state and conditioned upon compliance with this chapter. The total aggregate liability on the bond shall be limited to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). The bond may be terminated pursuant to Section 995.440 of, or Article 13 (commencing with Section 996.310) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 2 of, the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) The bond required by this section shall be in favor of, and payable to, the
 people of the State of California and shall be for the benefit of any person injured by any unlawful act, omission, or failure to provide the services of the talent service.

(c) The Labor Commissioner shall charge and collect a filing fee to cover the cost of filing the bond or deposit.

(d) (1) Whenever a deposit is made in lieu of the bond otherwise required by this section, the person asserting the claim against the deposit shall establish the claim by furnishing evidence to the Labor Commissioner of injury resulting from an unlawful act, omission, or failure to provide the services of the talent service or of a money judgment entered by a court.

(2) When a claimant has established the claim with the Labor Commissioner, the Labor Commissioner shall review and approve the claim and enter the
 date of the approval thereon. The claim shall be designated an approved claim.

(3) When the first claim against a particular deposit has been approved, it shall not be paid until the expiration of a period of 240 days after the date of its approval by the Labor Commissioner. Subsequent claims that are approved by the Labor Commissioner within the same 240-day period shall similarly not be paid until the expiration of that 240-day period. Upon the expiration of the 240-day period, the Labor Commissioner shall pay all approved claims from that 240-day period in full unless the deposit is insufficient, in which case every approved claim shall be paid a pro rata share of the deposit.

(4) Whenever the Labor Commissioner approves the first claim against a particular deposit after the expiration of a 240-day period, the date of approval of that claim shall begin a new 240-day period to
 which paragraph (3) applies with respect to any amount remaining in the deposit.

(5) After a deposit is exhausted, no further claims shall be paid by the Labor Commissioner. Claimants who have had claims paid in full or in part pursuant to paragraph (3) or (4) shall not be required to return funds received from the deposit for the benefit of other claimants.

(6) Whenever a deposit has been made in lieu of a bond, the amount of the deposit shall not be subject to attachment, garnishment, or execution with respect to an action or judgment against the assignor of the deposit, other than as to an amount as no longer needed or required for the purposes of this chapter and that would otherwise be returned to the assignor of the deposit by the Labor Commissioner.

(7) The Labor Commissioner shall return a deposit two years
 from the date it receives written notification from the assignor of the deposit that the assignor has ceased to engage in the business or act in the capacity of a talent service or has filed a bond pursuant to subdivision (a), provided that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit. The written notice shall include all of the following:

(A) The name, address, and telephone number of the assignor.

(B) The name, address, and telephone number of the bank at which the deposit is located.

(C) The account number of the deposit.

(D) A statement that the assignor is ceasing to engage in the business or act in the capacity of a talent service or has filed a bond with the Labor Commissioner. The Labor Commissioner shall forward an acknowledgment of
 receipt of the written notice to the assignor at the address indicated therein, specifying the date of receipt of the written notice and the anticipated date of release of the deposit, provided that there are then no outstanding claims against the deposit.

(8) A superior court may order the return of the deposit prior to the expiration of two years upon evidence satisfactory to the court that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit, or order the Labor Commissioner to retain the deposit for a specified period beyond the two years to resolve outstanding claims against the deposit.

(9) This subdivision applies to all deposits retained by the Labor Commissioner. The Labor Commissioner shall notify each assignor of a deposit it retains and of the applicability of this section.

(10) Compliance with Sections
 1700.15 and 1700.16 of this code or Section 1812.503, 1812.510, or 1812.515 of the Civil Code shall not satisfy the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1703.4.

(a) A talent service, its owners, directors, officers, agents, and employees shall not do any of the following through any means of communication, including, but not limited to, in person, through the use of a telecommunication device, in print, on the Internet, or through the use of a mobile or online application or other electronic communication:

(1) Make or cause to be made any advertisement or representation expressly or impliedly offering the opportunity for an artist to meet with or audition before any producer, director, casting
 director, or any associate thereof, or any other person who makes, or is represented to make, decisions for the process of hiring artists for employment as an artist, or any talent agent or talent manager, or any associate, representative, or designee thereof, unless the talent service maintains for inspection and copying written evidence of the supporting facts, including the name, business address, and job title of all persons conducting the meeting or audition, and the title of the production and the name of the production company.

(2) Make or cause to be made any advertisement or representation that any artist, whether identified or not, has obtained an audition, employment opportunity, or employment as an artist in whole or in part by use of the talent service unless the talent service maintains for inspection written evidence of the supporting
 facts upon which the claim is based, including the name of the artist and the approximate dates the talent service was used by the artist.

(3) Charge or attempt to charge an artist for an audition or employment opportunity.

(4) Require an artist, as a condition for using the talent service or for obtaining an additional benefit or preferential treatment from the talent service, to pay a fee for creating or providing photographs, filmstrips, videotapes, audition tapes, demonstration reels, or other reproductions of the artist, Internet Web sites, casting or talent brochures, or other promotional materials for the artist.

(5) Charge or attempt to charge an artist any fee not disclosed pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision
 (a) of Section 1703.

(6) Refer an artist to a person who charges the artist a fee for any service or any product in which the talent service, its owners, directors, officers, agents, or employees have a direct or indirect financial interest, unless the fee and the financial interest are conspicuously disclosed in a separate writing provided to the artist to keep prior to his or her execution of the contract with the talent service.

(7) Require an artist, as a condition for using a talent service or for obtaining any additional benefit or preferential treatment from the talent service, to pay a fee to any other talent service in which the talent service, its owners, directors, officers, agents, or employees have a direct or indirect financial interest.

(8) Accept any compensation or other consideration for referring an artist to any person charging the artist a fee.

(9) Fail to remove information about, or photographs of, the artist displayed on the talent service’s Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application or an Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application that the service has the authority to design or alter within 10 days of delivery of a request made by telephone, text message, mail, facsimile transmission, email, or other electronic communication from the artist or
 from a parent or guardian of the artist if the artist is a minor.

(b) A talent training service and talent counseling service and the owners, officers, directors, agents, and employees of the talent training service or talent counseling service shall not own, operate, or have a direct or indirect financial interest in a talent listing service.

(c) A talent listing service and its owners, officers, directors,
 agents, and employees shall not do any of the following:

(1) Own, operate, or have a direct or indirect financial interest in a talent training service or a talent counseling service.

(2) Provide a listing of an audition, job, or employment opportunity without written permission for the listing. A talent listing service shall keep and maintain a copy of all original listings; the name, business address, and business telephone number of the person granting permission to the talent listing service to use the listing; and the date the permission was granted.

(3) Make or cause to be made an advertisement or representation
 that includes the trademark, logo, name, word, or phrase of a company or organization, including a studio, production company, network, broadcaster, talent agency licensed pursuant to Section 1700.5, labor union, or labor organization as defined in Section 1117, in any manner that falsely or misleadingly suggests the endorsement, sponsorship, approval, or affiliation of a talent service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 245, Sec. 2.   (AB 2068)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1703.5.

No talent scout shall use the same name as used by any other talent scout soliciting for the same talent service, and no talent service shall permit a talent scout to use the same name as used by any other talent scout soliciting for the talent service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1703.6.

This article does not apply to any of the following:

(a) An entity described in subdivisions (a), (b), (d), (e), and (f) of Section 1702.4.

(b) (1) A private educational institution established solely for educational purposes which, as a part of its curriculum, offers employment counseling to its student body and satisfies either of the following:

(A) The institution conforms to the requirements of Article 5 (commencing with Section 33190) of Chapter 2 of Part 20 of Division 2 of Title 2 of the Education Code.

(B) More than 90 percent of the students
 to whom instruction, training, or education is provided during any semester or other term of instruction have completed or terminated their secondary education or are beyond the age of compulsory high school attendance. A person claiming exemption under this subparagraph shall maintain adequate records to establish the age of its students, including the name, date of birth, principal residence address, principal telephone number, driver’s license number and state of issuance thereof, and dates of attendance, and shall make them available for inspection and copying within 24 hours of a written request by the Labor Commissioner, the Attorney General, a district attorney, a city attorney, or a state or local law enforcement agency. The inspecting party shall maintain the confidentiality of any personal identifying information contained in the records maintained pursuant to this section, and shall not share, sell, or transfer the information to any third party unless it is otherwise authorized by state or
 federal law.

(2) A person claiming an exemption under this subdivision has the burden of producing evidence to establish the exemption.

(c) A psychologist or psychological corporation, licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, that provides psychological assessment, career or occupational counseling, or consultation and related professional services within the scope of its practice.

(d) An educational psychologist, licensed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 4980) of Chapter 13 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, who provides counseling services within the scope of his or her practice.

(e) A talent listing service, if all of the following apply:

(1) A majority interest in the service is owned by one or more colleges or universities, or alumni associations affiliated therewith, and each of the colleges or universities is accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education and a member organization of the Council of Postsecondary Accreditation.

(2) The service provides services exclusively for artists who are the alumni of colleges or universities specified in paragraph (1).

(3) The service does not require, as a condition to receiving services, an applicant to have completed courses or examinations beyond the requirements for graduation from the applicant’s college or university specified in paragraph (1).

(4) More than 50 percent of the annual revenues
 received by the service are derived from paid subscriptions of prospective employers.

(f) A public library.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Remedies [1704. - 1704.3.]

1704.

A person, including, an owner, officer, director, agent, or employee of a talent service, who willfully violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor. Each violation is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment. However, payment of restitution to an artist shall take precedence over the payment of a fine.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1704.1.

The Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney may institute an action for a violation of this chapter, including an action to restrain and enjoin a violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1704.2.

A person who is injured by a violation of this chapter or by the breach of a contract subject to this chapter may bring an action for recovery of damages or to restrain and enjoin a violation, or both. The court shall award to a plaintiff who prevails in an action under this chapter reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. The amount awarded for damages for a violation of this chapter shall be not less than three times the amount paid by the artist, or on behalf of the artist, to the talent service or the advance-fee talent representation service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1704.3.

The Labor Commissioner shall use the proceeds of a bond or deposit posted by a person pursuant to this chapter to satisfy a judgment or restitution order resulting from the person’s violation of a provision of this chapter, if the person fails to pay all amounts required by the judgment or restitution order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. General Provisions [1705. - 1705.4.]

1705.

The provisions of this chapter are not exclusive and do not relieve a person subject to this chapter from the duty to comply with all other laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1705.1.

The remedies provided in this chapter are not exclusive and shall be in addition to any other remedies or procedures provided in any other law, including Section 17500 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1705.2.

A waiver by an artist of the provisions of this chapter is deemed contrary to public policy and void and unenforceable. An attempt by a person or a talent service to have an artist waive his or her rights under this chapter is a violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1705.3.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held unconstitutional, the remainder of the chapter and the application of that provision to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1705.4.

Compliance with this chapter does not satisfy and is not a substitute for the requirements mandated by any other applicable law, including the obligation to obtain a license under the Talent Agencies Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1700)), prior to procuring, offering, promising, or attempting to procure employment or engagements for artists.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Child Performer Services Permits [1706. - 1706.5.]

1706.

(a) (1) No person shall represent or provide specified services to any artist who is a minor, under 18 years of age, without first submitting an application to the Labor Commissioner for a Child Performer Services Permit and receiving that permit.

(2) The Labor Commissioner shall set forth a filing fee, to be paid by the applicant to the commissioner at the time the application is filed, in an amount sufficient to reimburse the Labor Commissioner for the costs of the permit program. This amount shall be in addition to any charge imposed by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c).

(3) (A) The Labor Commissioner shall issue a Child Performer Services Permit to the applicant after he or she has received the application and filing fee and determined from information provided by the Department of Justice that the person is not required to register pursuant to Sections 290 to 290.006, inclusive, of the Penal Code.

(B) After receiving his or her first Child Performer Services Permit, a person shall on a biennial basis renew his or her application by resubmitting his or her name and a new filing fee to the Labor Commissioner in the amount set forth by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to paragraph (2). The Labor Commissioner shall issue a renewed permit to the person after receiving his or her application and filing fee and determining from the subsequent arrest notification provided by the Department of Justice pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) that the person is not required to register
 pursuant to Sections 290 to 290.006, inclusive, of the Penal Code. A person shall not be required to resubmit his or her fingerprints in order to renew his or her permit.

(b) Except for subdivision (f) and Sections 1706.1 to 1706.5, inclusive, when applied to a violation of subdivision (f), this chapter does not apply to the following:

(1) A person licensed as a talent agent as specified in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1700), or operating under the license of a talent agent.

(2) A studio teacher certified by the Labor Commissioner as defined in Section 11755 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) A person whose contact with minor children is restricted to locations where, either by law or regulation, the minor must be accompanied at
 all times by a parent or guardian, and the parent or guardian must be within sight or sound of the minor.

(4) A person who has only incidental and occasional contact with minor children, unless the person works directly with minor children, has supervision or disciplinary power over minor children, or receives a fee.

(c) (1) Each person required to submit an application to the Labor Commissioner pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall provide to the Department of Justice electronic fingerprint images and related information required by the department of all permit applicants, for the purposes of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal arrests and convictions, including arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on his or her recognizance pending trial or
 appeal.

(2) (A) When received, the Department of Justice shall forward the fingerprint images and related information described in paragraph (1) to the Federal Bureau of Investigation and request a federal summary for criminal history information.

(B) (i) The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response to the Labor Commissioner.

(ii) The Department of Justice’s response shall provide both state and federal criminal history information pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(C) The Labor Commissioner shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification
 service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for each person who submitted fingerprint images and the related information pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) (A) The Department of Justice shall charge the Labor Commissioner a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the request described in paragraph (2).

(B) In addition to the filing fee paid by the applicant pursuant to subdivision (a) to reimburse the Labor Commissioner for the costs of the permit program, the Labor Commissioner may charge the applicant a fee sufficient to cover the costs of the fee imposed by the Department of Justice pursuant to subparagraph (A). The amount of the fee imposed pursuant to this subparagraph shall be forwarded by the Labor Commissioner to the Department of Justice with the applicant’s name, fingerprints, and other information described in paragraph
 (1). This fee shall be available to the Department of Justice for the purposes described in subparagraph (A), upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(4) Upon receipt of information from the Department of Justice provided pursuant to subparagraphs (C) and (D) of paragraph (2), the commissioner shall timely cause a copy of the information to be sent to the person who has submitted the application, and shall keep a copy of the information and application on file.

(d) The Labor Commissioner shall maintain a list of all persons holding a valid Child Performer Services Permit issued under this chapter and make this list publicly available on its Internet Web site.

(e) (1) Upon receipt of a valid Child Performer Services Permit, the recipient shall post the permit in a conspicuous place in his or her
 place of business.

(2) Any person who is a recipient of a valid Child Performer Services Permit shall include the permit number on advertising in print or electronic media, including, but not limited to, Internet Web sites, or in any other medium of advertising.

(f) No person, including a person described in subdivision (b), who is required to register pursuant to Sections 290 to 290.006, inclusive, of the Penal Code may represent or provide specified services to any artist who is a minor.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Artist” means a person who is or seeks to become an actor, actress, model, extra, radio artist, musical artist, musical organization, director, musical director, writer,
 cinematographer, composer, lyricist, arranger, or other person rendering professional services in motion picture, theatrical, radio, television, Internet, print media, or other entertainment enterprises or technologies.

(2) Except as used in the context of a fee an applicant is required to pay with his or her application, “fee” means any money or other valuable consideration paid or promised to be paid by an artist, by an individual on behalf of an artist, or by a corporation formed on behalf of an artist for services rendered or to be rendered by any person conducting the business of representing artists.

(3) “Person” means any individual, company, society, firm, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, trust, or other organization.

(4) To “represent or provide specified services to” means
 to provide, offer to provide, or advertise or represent as providing, for a fee one or more of the following services:

(A) Photography for use as an artist, including, but not limited to, still photography, digital photography, and video and film services.

(B) Managing or directing the development or advancement of the artist’s career as an artist.

(C) Career counseling, career consulting, vocational guidance, aptitude testing, evaluation, or planning, in each case relating to the preparation of the artist for employment as an artist.

(D) Public relations services or publicity, or both, including arranging personal appearances, developing and distributing press packets, managing fan mail, designing and maintaining Internet Web sites, and consulting on
 media relations.

(E) Instruction, evaluation, lessons, coaching, seminars, workshops, or similar training as an artist, including, but not limited to, acting, singing, dance, voice, or similar instruction services.

(F) A camp for artists, which includes, but is not limited to, a day camp or overnight camp in which any portion of the camp includes any services described in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive.

(h) (1) The Labor Commissioner shall deposit all filing fees described in subdivision (a) into the Labor Enforcement and Compliance Fund to pay for the costs of administering the Child Performer Services Permit program.

(2) On the effective date of the statute adding this subdivision, any moneys in the Child Performer Services
 Permit Fund and any assets, liabilities, revenues, expenditures, and encumbrances of that fund shall be transferred to the Labor Enforcement and Compliance Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 183.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1706.1.

A person who willfully violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor. Each violation is punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 634, Sec. 1.   (AB 1660)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1706.2.

The Attorney General, any district attorney, or any city attorney may institute an action for a violation of this chapter, including an action to restrain and enjoin a violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 634, Sec. 1.   (AB 1660)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1706.3.

A person who is injured as a result of any violation of this chapter committed by a person required to obtain a permit pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1706 may bring an action to recover damages or to restrain and enjoin a violation, or both. The amount of damages that may be awarded for a violation of this chapter is up to three times the damages actually incurred. A final judgment may be satisfied from the bond or deposit maintained by the Labor Commissioner, if any. A person bringing an action under this chapter who prevails shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. The court may award punitive damages in addition to any other amounts if it determines, by clear and convincing evidence, that the violation of this chapter was willful.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 634, Sec. 1.   (AB 1660)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1706.4.

The provisions of this chapter are not exclusive and do not relieve any person subject to this chapter from the duty to comply with all other laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 634, Sec. 1.   (AB 1660)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1706.5.

The remedies provided in this chapter are not exclusive and are in addition to any other remedies or procedures provided in any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 634, Sec. 1.   (AB 1660)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. PUBLIC WORKS AND PUBLIC AGENCIES [1720. - 1964.]



  CHAPTER 1. Public Works [1720. - 1861.]



  ARTICLE 1. Scope and Operation [1720. - 1743.]

1720.

(a) As used in this chapter, “public works” means all of the following:

(1) Construction, alteration, demolition, installation, or repair work done under contract and paid for in whole or in part out of public funds, except work done directly by a public utility company pursuant to order of the Public Utilities Commission or other public authority. For purposes of this paragraph, “construction” includes work performed during the design, site assessment, feasibility study, and other preconstruction phases of construction, including, but not limited to, inspection and land surveying work, regardless of whether any further construction work is conducted, and work performed during the
 postconstruction phases of construction, including, but not limited to, all cleanup work at the jobsite. For purposes of this paragraph, “installation” includes, but is not limited to, the assembly and disassembly of freestanding and affixed modular office systems.

(2) Work done for irrigation, utility, reclamation, and improvement districts, and other districts of this type. “Public works” does not include the operation of the irrigation or drainage system of an irrigation or reclamation district, except as used in Section 1778 relating to retaining wages.

(3) Street, sewer, or other improvement work done under the direction and supervision or by the authority of an officer or public body of the state, or of a political subdivision or district thereof, whether the political
 subdivision or district operates under a freeholder’s charter or not.

(4) The laying of carpet done under a building lease-maintenance contract and paid for out of public funds.

(5) The laying of carpet in a public building done under contract and paid for in whole or in part out of public funds.

(6) Public transportation demonstration projects authorized pursuant to Section 143 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(7) (A) Infrastructure project grants from the California Advanced Services Fund pursuant to Section 281 of the Public Utilities Code.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the
 Public Utilities Commission is not the awarding body or the body awarding the contract, as defined in Section 1722.

(8) Tree removal work done in the execution of a project under paragraph (1).

(b) For purposes of this section, “paid for in whole or in part out of public funds” means all of the following:

(1) The payment of money or the equivalent of money by the state or political subdivision directly to or on behalf of the public works contractor, subcontractor, or developer.

(2) Performance of construction work by the state or political subdivision in execution of the project.

(3) Transfer by
 the state or political subdivision of an asset of value for less than fair market price.

(4) Fees, costs, rents, insurance or bond premiums, loans, interest rates, or other obligations that would normally be required in the execution of the contract, that are paid, reduced, charged at less than fair market value, waived, or forgiven by the state or political subdivision.

(5) Money loaned by the state or political subdivision that is to be repaid on a contingent basis.

(6) Credits that are applied by the state or political subdivision against repayment obligations to the state or political subdivision.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), all of the following apply:

(1) Private residential projects built on private property are not subject to this chapter unless the projects are built pursuant to an agreement with a state agency, a redevelopment agency, a successor agency to a redevelopment agency when acting in that capacity, or a local public housing authority.

(2) If the state or a political subdivision requires a private developer to perform construction, alteration, demolition, installation, or repair work on a public work of improvement as a condition of regulatory approval of an otherwise private development project, and the state or political subdivision contributes no more money, or the equivalent of money, to the overall project than is required to perform this public improvement work, and the state or political subdivision maintains
 no proprietary interest in the overall project, then only the public improvement work shall thereby become subject to this chapter.

(3) (A) If the state or a political subdivision reimburses a private developer for costs that would normally be borne by the public, or provides directly or indirectly a public subsidy to a private development project that is de minimis in the context of the project, an otherwise private development project shall not thereby become subject to this chapter.
